Hawaii, session 2026, HB2422.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $60,200,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the nineteenth representative district, as follows: 1.   Maunalua Bay beach park Plans, design, and construction for phase 2 repairs to boat launch, parking lot, and beach park at Maunalua Bay beach park. Plans                          $500,000 Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $6,500,000 Total funding                     $7,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 2.   Aina Haina elementary school Equipment and appurtenances for the electrical upgrade of campus. Equipment                      $900,000 Total funding                       $900,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 3.   Aina Haina elementary school Equipment and appurtenances for air conditioning for campus classrooms and staff meeting areas. Equipment                      $300,000 Total funding                       $300,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 4.   Aina Haina elementary school Construction for a multipurpose health room and office adjacent to the administration building on the makai side. Construction                 $1,500,000 Total funding                     $1,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 5.   Kaiser high school Design and construction for the performing arts complex, including a one thousand two hundred seat auditorium with a stage to seat three hundred musicians; film production and broadcast studio; scene shop; science, technology, engineering, and mathematics innovation space; dance studio; art gallery; and graphics arts classroom. Design                       $5,250,000 Construction                $44,250,000 Total funding                    $49,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 6.   Kalauhaihai fishpond (Lucas Spring) Construction for unforeseen costs to complete restoration of fresh artesian water flow to the fishpond. Construction                   $500,000 Total funding                       $500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________